src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON GOEGKERDADTEDH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row D - Group IV
          +Ind+Prs:%>               V-IV-EVEN-PRS    ;
          +Ind+Prt:%>               VSUF-PRT         ;
            +Imprt:%>               VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
              +Inf:%>edh            FINAL1           ;
             +VGen:%>en             FINAL1           ;
! +Act:%>eme      FINAL1 ;
              +Ger:%>eminie         FINAL1           ;
           +PrsPrc:%>ije            flagFINAL1           ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ijes  FINAL1 ;
           +PrfPrc:%>eme            FINAL1           ;
           +ConNeg:%>0h             FINAL1           ;
! Derivations
! -----------
   +Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»ij  flagN_ODD            ;
  +Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»em  flagNomActOdd        ;
     +Der1+Der/les+A:e%»l             LES              ;
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»egået          GÅETEDH          ;
 +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»ijahtj         AHTJE            ;

LEXICON OBREDADTEDH  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                          +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%>%^3sUMLa               FINAL1    ;
                              +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i                      FINAL1    ;
                      +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPi              FINAL1    ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:%>         VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                                      +V+IV+Inf:%>edh                    FINAL1    ;
                                     +V+IV+VGen:%>en                     FINAL1    ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                                      +V+IV+Ger:%>eminie                 FINAL1    ;
                                   +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>eme                    FINAL1    ;
                                   +V+IV+ConNeg:%>0h                     FINAL1    ;
! Derivations
! -----------
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     N_ODD ;
                          +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»em  flagNomActOdd ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/les+A:e%»l LES ;
         +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%»egået%>%^1UMLa         FINAL1    ;
         +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%»egået%>%^iUMLi         FINAL1    ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»egået%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi FINAL1    ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Inf:%»egået%>edh             FINAL1    ;
                  +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+ConNeg:%»egået%>ieh             FINAL1    ;
                    +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+VGen:%»egået%>ien             FINAL1    ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Act:%»egået%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ger:%»egået%>ieminie         FINAL1    ;
              +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+PrfPrc+Uml:%»egået%>%^1UMLeme       FINAL1    ;
         +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»ijahtj%>%^3sUMLa       FINAL1    ;
             +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»ijahtj%>i              FINAL1    ;
     +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»ijahtj%>%^DISIMPi      FINAL1    ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Inf:%»ijahtj%>edh            FINAL1    ;
                    +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+VGen:%»ijahtj%>en             FINAL1    ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Act:%»ijahtj%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ger:%»ijahtj%>eminie         FINAL1    ;
                  +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+PrfPrc:%»ijahtj%>eme            FINAL1    ;
                  +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+ConNeg:%»ijahtj%>0h             FINAL1    ;

LEXICON GÅETEDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+TV: GÅETEDH ;

LEXICON GÅETEDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+IV: GÅETEDH ;


LEXICON GÅETEDH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** from Der/InchL
 +Ind+Prs+Uml:%>%^1UMLa   V-I-PRS-SG         ; ! class I special
     +Ind+Prs:%>ie        VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
 +Ind+Prt+Uml:%>%^iUML    VSUF-PRT           ;
       +Imprt:%>          VSUF-EVEN-IMP      ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
         +Inf:%>edh       FINAL1             ;
      +ConNeg:%>ieh       FINAL1             ;
        +VGen:%>ien       FINAL1             ;
! +Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
         +Ger:%>ieminie   FINAL1             ;
  +PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme FINAL1             ;
! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt

LEXICON STIEHPEGÅETEDH  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
         +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%>%^1UMLa   FINAL1 ; ! class I special
         +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%>%^iUMLi   FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>%^iUMLi   FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:%>              VSUF-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                     +V+IV+Inf:%>edh       FINAL1 ;
                  +V+IV+ConNeg:%>ieh       FINAL1 ;
                    +V+IV+VGen:%>ien       FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                     +V+IV+Ger:%>ieminie   FINAL1 ;
              +V+IV+PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme FINAL1 ;


LEXICON AHTJE_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+TV: AHTJE ;

LEXICON AHTJE_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +V+IV: AHTJE ;

LEXICON OBRIJAHTJEDH  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%>%^3sUMLa  FINAL1 ;
         +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i         FINAL1 ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                 +V+IV+Inf:%>edh       FINAL1 ;
                +V+IV+VGen:%>en        FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                 +V+IV+Ger:%>eminie    FINAL1 ;
              +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>eme       FINAL1 ;
              +V+IV+ConNeg:%>0h        FINAL1 ;


LEXICON AHTJE   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row D - Group IV
 +Ind+Prs:%>       V-IV-EVEN-PRS    ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>       VSUF-PRT         ;
   +Imprt:%>       VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
     +Inf:%>edh    FINAL1           ;
    +VGen:%>en     FINAL1           ;
! +Act:%>eme      FINAL1 ;
     +Ger:%>eminie FINAL1           ;
  +PrfPrc:%>eme    FINAL1           ;
  +ConNeg:%>0h     FINAL1           ;

LEXICON SOVVEDH !!≈ * **@CODE@**row D - Group IV
          +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%>               V-IV-EVEN-PRS ;
          +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%>               VSUF-PRT      ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:%>         VSUF-IV-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
              +V+IV+Inf:%>edh            FINAL1        ;
             +V+IV+VGen:%>en             FINAL1        ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme      FINAL1 ;
              +V+IV+Ger:%>eminie         FINAL1        ;
! +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ije   FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ijes   FINAL1 ;
           +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>eme            flagFINAL1        ;
           +V+IV+ConNeg:%>0h             FINAL1        ;
! Derivations
! -----------
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»ij@C.NeedNoun@     N_ODD ;
  +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»em  flagNomActOdd     ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»egået          GÅETEDH       ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»ijahtj         AHTJE         ;
